Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 2. County Clerk

§ 171.
Appointment.

The assistant judges shall appoint a county clerk who shall be sworn and hold his or her office during the pleasure of such judges and until his or her successor is appointed and has qualified.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 169.

§ 172.
Certificate of appointment.

Upon the appointment of a county clerk, such judges shall transmit to the Secretary of State their certificate of appointment and qualification of such clerk signed by them. Such certificate shall bear on its face the signature and impression of the official seal of the clerk and verification of the genuineness of each.

§ 173.
Certificate of Secretary of State.

Upon request, the Secretary of State shall certify under seal to the appointment, qualification, and authority of a county clerk described in a certificate on file in his or her office, and as to the genuineness of the signature and seal of office of a county clerk appearing on any instrument within the authority of such clerk to execute.

§ 174.
Repealed. 2009, No; 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 238.

§ 175.
Bond to county.

Before entering upon the duties of his or her office, a county clerk shall become bound to the county in the sum of $3,000.00, with sufficient sureties, by way of recognizance, before the assistant judges, or give a bond to the county executed by principal and sureties in like sum to be approved by the assistant judges, conditioned for the faithful performance of his or her duties. Such bonds of county clerks shall be taken biennially in the month of February and recorded in the office of the county clerk.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 170.

§ 176.
Deputy clerk.

A county clerk may, subject to the approval of the assistant judges, appoint one or more deputies who may perform the duties of clerk for whose acts he or she shall be responsible and whose deputations he or she may revoke at pleasure. A record of the appointments shall be made in the office of the clerk. In case of the death of the clerk or his or her inability to act, the deputy or deputies in order of appointment shall perform the duties of the office until a clerk is appointed. In case of the suspension of the clerk’s duties as a condition of release pending trial for violating

13 V.S.A. § 2537

, the assistant judges of the county shall appoint a person to perform the duties of the office until the charge of violating

13 V.S.A. § 2537

is resolved. The compensation for the clerk and deputy clerk shall be fixed by the assistant judges and paid for by the county. Such compensation may include such employment benefits as are presently provided to State employees, including health insurance, life insurance, and pension plan, the expense for which shall be borne by the county and the employees.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 106

, § 7, eff. May 25, 1973;

2007, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 171.

§ 177.
Certification of election and qualification of officers.

Upon request, a county clerk shall certify under seal to the election or appointment of officers or magistrates, certificates of whose election or appointment and of having taken the oath of office, when such oath is required, have been filed with him or her as provided by law.

§ 178.
Record of sheriff’s commission; copies; evidence.

The county clerk shall record, in a book kept for that purpose, sheriffs’ commissions with the oath of office indorsed thereon. In case of loss or destruction of an original commission or recognizance, a certified copy of the record may be used in court as evidence of the facts therein contained.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 172.

§ 179.
Repealed.
1969, No. 282 (Adj. Sess.), § 14.

§ 180.
Claim; clerk to draw orders.

Claims against a county shall be examined and allowed by the assistant judges, unless other provision is made by law.
A statement of each claim with the amount allowed shall be certified by them to the county clerk, who shall draw an order therefor upon the county treasurer.

§ 181.
Settlements; record; filing.

Such clerk shall keep on file in his or her office the statements furnished him or her by the assistant judges, upon which he or she has drawn orders, and shall keep a record of such orders, within the number of each, its date, amount, to whom payable, and for what purpose drawn. He or she shall also preserve and keep on file the claims, accounts, or vouchers for which such orders were drawn.

§ 182.
Repealed. 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 238.

§ 183.
Repealed. 2019, No. 178 (Adj. Sess.), § 27, eff. October 1, 2020.

§ 184.
Processing of passport applications.

The county clerk shall, if so directed by the assistant judges, accept and process applications for U.S. passports pursuant to memorandums of understanding entered into under

4 V.S.A. § 691

.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 1

, § 11, eff. February 2, 2011.